Kansas, session 2025-2026, HB2017.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. K.S.A. 25-1132 is hereby amended to read as follows: 25-
1132. (a) All advance voting ballots that are received in the office of the
county election officer or any polling place within the county not later than
the hour for closing of the polls on the date of any election specified in
K.S.A. 25-1122(f), and amendments thereto, shall be delivered by the
county election officer to the appropriate special election board provided
for in K.S.A. 25-1133, and amendments thereto.
(b) Subject to the deadline for receipt by the office of the county
election officer as set forth in this subsection, all advance voting ballots
received by mail by the office of the county election officer after the
closing of the polls on the date of any election specified in K.S.A. 25-
1122(f), and amendments thereto, and which are postmarked or are
otherwise indicated by the United States postal service to have been
mailed on or before the close of the polls on the date of the election, shall
be delivered by the county election officer to a special election board or
the county board of canvassers, as determined by the secretary of state, for
canvassing in a manner consistent, as nearly as may be, with other advance
voting ballots. The deadline for the receipt by mail of the advance voting
ballots by the office of the county election officer shall be the last delivery
of mail by the United States postal service 7:00 p.m. on the third day
following the date of the election.
(c) The secretary of state shall adopt rules and regulations to
implement this subsection section.
Sec. 2. K.S.A. 25-1132 is hereby repealed.
Sec. 3. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.